Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1002
Rural water districts; petition.

The county board of each county in this state shall, upon a proper petition being presented, incorporate and organize rural water districts in the manner provided by sections 46-1001 to 46-1020. No such district shall be incorporated when its boundaries lie within five miles of any incorporated city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class, within two miles of any incorporated city of the second class, or within one mile of any incorporated village until approval has been given by the governing body of the city or village.

Laws 1967, c. 279, § 2, p. 748;

Laws 1972, LB 1239, § 1.